Hawaii statutes.
§612-58 Grand jury proceedings. (a)
Each grand jury proceeding conducted under the authority of the State shall be
provided with access to grand jury counsel.

(b) The deliberation and the voting of the
grand jury shall be private; provided that the grand jury may interrupt its
deliberation or voting in order to call in the grand jury counsel for the
purpose of making specific inquiries of counsel or may transmit written
inquiries to counsel from the privacy of its deliberation or voting, but all
such inquiries shall be restricted to matters of law.

(c) All inquiries made by the grand jury of
the grand jury counsel and all exchanges between them shall be recorded
verbatim and made part of the record of the grand jury proceedings. [L 1980, c
209, §9; am L 1982, c 101, §3]

Case Notes

At outset of each session, grand jury counsel must note
presence on record and give instructions on procedures to summon for
consultation; grand jury counsel need not be physically present throughout
proceeding. 64 H. 197, 638 P.2d 309 (1981).

Given that appellant was indicted prior to enactment of this
part, indictment was not defective for absence of grand jury counsel. 64 H.
363, 641 P.2d 320 (1982).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next